Utah statutes.
75-2-301.   Entitlement of spouse -- Premarital will.
(1)  If a testator's surviving spouse married the testator after the testator
executed his will, the surviving spouse is entitled to receive, as an
intestate share, no less than the value of the share of the estate he would
have received if the testator had died intestate as to that portion of the
testator's estate, if any, that neither is devised to a child of the testator
who was born before the testator married the surviving spouse and who is not a
child of the surviving spouse nor is devised to a descendant of such a child
or passes under Section 75-2-603 or 75-2-604 to such a child or to a
descendant of such a child, unless:
(a)  it appears from the will or other evidence that the will was made in
contemplation of the testator's marriage to the surviving spouse;
(b)  the will expresses the intention that it is to be effective
notwithstanding any subsequent marriage;  or
(c)  the testator provided for the spouse by transfer outside the will and the
intent that the transfer be in lieu of a testamentary provision is shown by
the testator's statements or is reasonably inferred from the amount of the
transfer or other evidence.
(2)  In satisfying the share provided by this section, devises made by the
will to the testator's surviving spouse, if any, are applied first, and other
devises, other than a devise to a child of the testator who was born before
the testator married the surviving spouse and who is not a child of the
surviving spouse or a devise or substitute gift under Section 75-2-603 or
75-2-604 to a descendant of such a child, abate as provided in Section
75-3-902.
